Utah statutes.
72-10-307.   Powers of governing bodies.

The governing body of any public agency having power to appropriate and raise money is authorized to appropriate, and to raise by taxation or otherwise, sufficient money to carry out the provisions and purposes of this part.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 270, 1998 General Session

